Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.281

Certificate of existence or registration.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.235 to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic limited partnership or a certificate of registration for a foreign limited partnership.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6115; 2009 c 188 s 209.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.